New York, session 2025-2026, S461.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The environmental conservation law is amended by adding a 2 new section 37-0122 to read as follows: 3 § 37-0122. Prohibition against industrial uses of perfluoroalkyl and 4 polyfluoroalkyl substances. 5 1. No person shall use in an industrial plant any product or substance 6 that contains perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl, including but not 7 limited to vats, conveyor belts, molds, ovens, pans, pots, chemicals 8 used as mold releasers, lubricants, seals, and coatings. 9 2. For purposes of this section, "industrial plant" shall have the 10 same meaning set forth in section eighteen hundred one of the public 11 authorities law. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect three years after it shall have become 13 a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01903-01-5